Idaho, session 2025, H0226.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 47-1206, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
47-1206. PAYMENT OF MINE LICENSE TAX. (1) Except as provided in sub-
section (2), the license tax imposed by this chapter shall be paid to the
state tax commission on or before the due date of the return and the com-
mission shall remit the sums to the state treasurer, who shall place sixty-
six percent (66%) fifty percent (50%) to the credit of the general fund of
the state and thirty-four percent (34%) fifty percent (50%) to the credit
of the abandoned mine reclamation fund created by the provisions of section
47-1703, Idaho Code.
(2) The license tax imposed by this chapter only on mining operations
that include a cyanidation facility, as defined by section 47-1503, Idaho
Code, shall be paid to the state tax commission on or before the due date of
the return and the commission shall remit the sums to the state treasurer,
who shall place thirty-three percent (33%) to the credit of the general fund
of the state, thirty-three percent (33%) to the credit of the cyanidation
facility closure fund created by the provisions of section 47-1513, Idaho
Code, and thirty-four percent (34%) to the credit of the abandoned mine
reclamation fund created by the provisions of section 47-1703, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 47-1703, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
47-1703. FUNDING. (1) This chapter shall govern the use of state and
federal moneys specifically appropriated for abandoned mine reclamation.
This chapter shall not require the state to expend or appropriate state mon-
eys. The board may receive federal funds, state funds, and any other funds,


including voluntary contributions, and, within the limits imposed by a spe-
cific grant, expend them as directed by this chapter. All grants, funds,
fees, fines, penalties, and other uncleared money which that has been or will
be paid to the state for abandoned mine reclamation shall be placed in the
state treasury and credited to the abandoned mine reclamation fund, which is
hereby created. This fund shall be available to the board, by legislative
appropriation, and shall be expended for the reclamation of lands affected
by eligible mining operations.
(2) At least ninety percent (90%) of all reclamation funds expended an-
nually shall be spent on expenses directly incurred for eligible mine site
engineering and on-site restoration plan implementation and on compensation
for services paid pursuant to section 47-1709, Idaho Code.
(3) Voluntary contributions shall be designated for eligible mine
restoration and:
(a) Shall be considered as mitigation to meet or partially meet envi-
ronmental mitigation requirements set by state agencies for construct-
ing, expanding, or operating a mine; and
(b) May be considered as mitigation to meet or partially meet environ-
mental mitigation requirements set by federal agencies for construct-
ing, expanding, or operating a mine.
SECTION 3. That Section 47-1704, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
47-1704. DEFINITIONS. (1) "Abandoned mine" means a mine deserted by
the operator, having no regular maintenance, and not covered by a valid min-
ing claim.
(2) "Affected land" means the land adjacent to an eligible mine that is,
or may be, adversely affected by past mining operations.
(3) "Board" means the state board of land commissioners or such depart-
ment, commission, or agency as may lawfully succeed to the powers and duties
of such board.
(4) "Department" means the Idaho department of lands.
(4) (5) "Director" means the head of the department of lands or such of-
ficer as may lawfully succeed to the powers and duties of said director.
(5) (6) "Eligible mine" means an abandoned mine located on land owned by
the state or federal government or an abandoned mine located on private land
when the owner of the private land has requested, and the board has granted,
designation as an eligible mine.
(6) (7) "Mine" means an area where valuable minerals were extracted
from the earth and includes all associated development areas including, but
not limited to, milling and processing areas, overburden disposal areas,
stockpiles, roads, tailings ponds, and other areas disturbed at the mining
operation site.
(7) (8) "Operator" means any person or persons, any partnership, lim-
ited partnership, or corporation, or any association of persons, either nat-
ural or artificial including, but not limited to, every public or govern-
mental agency engaged in mining or mineral exploration operations, whether
individually, jointly, or through subsidiaries, agents, employees, or con-
tractors and shall mean every governmental agency owning or controlling the
use of any mine when the mineral extracted is to be used by or for the benefit


of such agency. It shall not include any governmental agency with respect to
those mining or mineral exploration operations as to which it grants mineral
leases or prospecting permits or similar contracts, but nothing herein shall
relieve the operator acting pursuant to a mineral lease, prospecting permit
or similar contract from the terms of this chapter.
(8) (9) "Valuable mineral" shall have the same meaning as "valuable
mineral" defined in section 47-1205, Idaho Code.
(10) "Voluntary contribution" means any moneys contributed by a non-
governmental organization or a publicly or privately held company.
SECTION 4. That Section 47-1706, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
47-1706. DUTIES AND POWERS OF BOARD. In addition to the other duties
and powers of the board prescribed by law, the board is granted and shall be
entitled to exercise the following authority and powers and perform the fol-
lowing duties:
(1) To reclaim any eligible mine and affected lands. Reclamation on
federal lands shall be completed only upon consent of the federal agency re-
sponsible for the administration of those lands. Reclamation activities may
include:
(a) The reclamation and restoration of abandoned surface mined areas;
(b) The reclamation of abandoned milling and processing areas;
(c) The sealing, filling, and grading of abandoned deep mine entries;
(d) The planting of land adversely affected by past mining to prevent
erosion and sedimentation;
(e) The prevention, abatement, treatment, and control of water pollu-
tion created by abandoned mine drainage;
(f) The control of surface subsidence due to abandoned deep mines; and
(g) Such other reclamation activities as may be necessary to accomplish
the purposes of this act.
(2) To administer and enforce the provisions of this act and the rules
and orders promulgated thereunder as provided in this act.
(3) To conduct and promote the coordination and acceleration of re-
search, studies, surveys, experiments, demonstrations, and training in
carrying out the provisions of this act. In carrying out the activities
authorized in this section, the board may enter into contracts with and make
grants to institutions, agencies, organizations, and individuals, and shall
collect and make available any information obtained therefrom.
(4) To adopt and promulgate reasonable rules respecting the adminis-
tration of this act and such rules as may be necessary to carry out the intent
and purposes of this act. All such rules shall be adopted in accordance with
and subject to the provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.
(5) To enter upon eligible mines and affected lands at reasonable
times, for inspection purposes and to determine whether the provisions of
this act are being complied with. Inspections on private lands shall be con-
ducted in the presence of the landowner or his duly authorized employees or
representatives, or with written permission of the landowner.
(6) To establish an advisory committee to assist the department in set-
ting priorities and planning reclamation work. The committee members shall


be nominated by the governor and approved by the board. The committee shall
consist of:
(a) One (1) representative from the Idaho department of environmental
quality;
(b) One (1) representative from the governor's office of energy and
mineral resources;
(c) One (1) representative who is a county commissioner from a county
with active mines;
(d) One (1) representative representing conservation interests; and
(e) Three (3) representatives from mining organizations or companies
who are actively mining within the state of Idaho.
SECTION 5. That Chapter 17, Title 47, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 47-1707, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
47-1707. RESPONSIBILITIES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF LANDS. In addition to
the duties and responsibilities assigned by the board, the department shall:
(1) Maintain a list of the eligible mines, based on the priority crite-
ria pursuant to section 47-1708, Idaho Code. The list shall be updated annu-
ally and made publicly available;
(2) Annually publish a report that, by mine site, describes how funds
from the abandoned mine reclamation fund were used, the specific actions
taken, and the progress made to reclaim abandoned mines; and
(3) Consult with the advisory committee created pursuant to section
47-1706, Idaho Code, in setting priorities and planning reclamation work.
SECTION 6. That Section 47-1707, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
47-1707 47-1708. PRIORITIES. Expenditure of funds from the abandoned
mine reclamation account fund shall reflect the following priorities in the
order stated:
(1) The protection of public health, safety, and general welfare from
the adverse effects of past mining practices.
(2) The restoration of land and water resources water quality that was
previously degraded by the adverse effects of past mining practices, espe-
cially in areas where water quality standards are not met.
(3) The restoration of land resources that were previously degraded by
the adverse effects of past mining practices.
SECTION 7. That Section 47-1708, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
47-1708 47-1709. INTERAGENCY COORDINATION. The board shall recognize
other governmental, educational, and private organizations or agencies
which have expertise and information regarding abandoned mines and affected
lands. The board shall characterize, prioritize, and complete reclamation
of eligible mines and affected lands in coordination with these agencies. In
addition, the board may reasonably compensate them from the abandoned mine
reclamation account fund for services that the board requests they provide.


SECTION 8. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.